Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1018
Report.

Beginning April 1, 2009, and annually on or before April 1 thereafter, each eligible entity administering a program for eligible energy conservation grants under the Low-Income Home Energy Conservation Act shall submit to the department a report describing each eligible energy conservation grant made by the eligible entity during the preceding calendar year and the eligible energy conservation improvement for which each such grant was made.

Laws 2008, LB1001, § 7.
January 1, 2009July 1, 2019